Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
634

CIVIL
ACTIONS AND PROCEEDINGS, GENERALLY

Part I. Parties, General Provisions

Section

634-1 Assignee; nonnegotiable chose

634-2 Joint contractual obligations

634-3 Actions against persons by firm name

Part II. Interpleader

634-11 Interpleader; application for order by
sheriff,

deputy sheriff, police officer, or
independent

civil process server

634-12 Sale of property seized on
execution, when

634-13 Questions of law; submission to supreme
court

Part III. Service

634-21 Service of process, by whom

634-21.5 Service of process within a condominium,

cooperative housing, or planned community

634-22 Return

634-23 Joinder of unknown persons; service when
defendant

unknown or absent

634-24 Service outside the state or by registered
mail

634-25 Personal service on resident outside the
state

634-26 Form of published notice

634-27 Substituted service of summons in
attachment cases

634-28 Form of judgment

634-29 In case of attachment, etc., of real
property

634-30 Organizations and associations, service of
process

on; judgment

634-31 Same; nonresidents; service

634-32 Other laws not affected

634-33 Service in cases of operation of motor
vehicles

634-34 Service on boat operators

634-35 Acts submitting to jurisdiction

634-36 Manner of service under sections 634-33 to
35

634-37 Presumption of notice and service of
process in

child support cases

634-38 Manner of service within the State;
assumpsit

Part IV. Notice of Pendency of Action

634-51 Recording of notice of pendency of action

Part V. Abatement and Revival

634-61 Death or dissolution of plaintiff or
defendant

Part VI. Anonymous Filings

634-71 Anonymous filings

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1972, c 89, §2A(s).

Act 89, L 1972, as amended by Act 109, L 1973, completely
revised this chapter, repealing a number of sections in the process. The
remaining sections are renumbered as set forth herein. The following table
shows the current disposition of the chapter.

Working group to define duties and responsibilities of
process servers under the department of public safety's jurisdiction; create a
process of registration, etc. (repealed June 30, 2020). L 2013, c 116, §§20 to
23, 25; L 2015, c 101, §4.

Disposition Table

____________________________________________________

HRS (1968) Herein HRS (1968) Herein

____________________________________________________

634-1 to 20 R 634-57 R

634-26, 27 R 634-58 to 60 634-22 to 24

634-31 634-1 634-60.5 634-25

634-32 R 634-61 634-27

634-33 634-2 634-62 634-28

634-34 634-3 634-63 634-26

634-41, 42 R 634-64 634-29

634-43 634-11 634-65 R

634-44 R 634-66 to 72 634-30 to 36

634-45 634-12 634-76 634-51

634-46 R 634-81 R

634-47 634-13 634-82 634-61

634-48 R 634-83 to 86 R

634-51 R 634-91 to 98 R

634-56 634-21

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next